North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-22 Limited Liability Partnerships
45-22-16.
Secretary of state — Revocation of registration.

The registration of a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership fails:

To appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

To file any amendment to the registration of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership as required to be filed pursuant to subdivision b or c of subsection 4 of section 45-22-03;

Fails to file a merger as required to be filed pursuant to subdivision d of subsection 4 of section 45-22-03; or

Fails to file a withdrawal statement or cancellation of its registration if the foreign limited liability partnership’s existence expires, it is dissolved, or it ceases to exist in the jurisdiction of origin.

An intentional misrepresentation is made in any material matter in any registration, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter.

Except for revocation of the registration for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 45-22-21.1, the secretary of state may not revoke the registration of a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership unless:

The secretary of state gave the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership at least sixty days’ notice of the reason for the pending revocation by mail addressed to the registered agent of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership at the registered office or, if the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, by mail addressed to its principal executive office; and

During the sixty-day period, the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership fails:

To appoint and maintain a registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

To file the report of change regarding the name or business address of the registered agent;

To file any amendment to the registration of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership required to be filed pursuant to subdivision b or c of subsection 4 of section 45-22-03; or

To correct the misrepresentation.

Upon the expiration of the sixty-day period without the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership curing the reason for the pending revocation set forth in the notice, the registration is revoked. The secretary of state shall note the revocation in the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the revocation to the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership. Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office. If the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership failed to appoint and maintain a registered office in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal executive office.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 234; 1999, ch. 95, § 190; 2007, ch. 99, § 78; 2011, ch. 87, § 71; 2015, ch. 86, § 22, effective July 1, 2015.

45-22-17.
Service of process on a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership and on a nonresident partner.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited liability partnership, the foreign limited liability partnership, or a partner may be served as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 235; 1999, ch. 95, § 191; 2003, ch. 85, § 159; 2005, ch. 100, § 141; 2007, ch. 99, § 79.

45-22-18.
Foreign limited liability partnership — Governing law.

The laws of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of origin govern:

The relations among the partners of a foreign limited liability partnership, or the relations between any partner or partners of a foreign limited liability partnership and the foreign limited liability partnership; and

The liability of partners for obligations of a foreign limited liability partnership.

A foreign limited liability partnership may not be denied registration to transact business in this state by reason of any difference between the laws of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of origin and the laws of this state.

A foreign limited liability partnership holding a valid registration in this state has the same, but no greater, rights and privileges as a domestic limited liability partnership. The registration does not authorize the foreign limited liability partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a domestic limited liability partnership may not engage in or exercise as a limited liability partnership.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 236; 1999, ch. 95, § 192.

45-22-19.
Foreign limited liability partnership — Transacting business and obtaining licenses and permits by a foreign limited liability partnership.

No foreign limited liability partnership may transact business in this state or obtain any license or permit required by this state until the partnership has registered with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-20.
Transaction of business by a foreign limited liability partnership without registration.

A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain any cause of action in any court of this state until the partnership registers with the secretary of state.

The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to register with the secretary of state does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or prevent the foreign limited liability partnership from defending any claim for relief in any court of this state.

A limitation on the personal liability of a partner is not waived solely by the foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state without having filed a registration with the secretary of state.

A foreign limited liability partnership, by transacting business in this state without registering with the secretary of state, appoints the secretary of state as the agent upon whom any notice, process, or demand may be served.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 237; 1999, ch. 95, § 193.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-20.1.
Foreign limited liability partnership — Transactions by a foreign limited liability partnership not constituting the transactions of business.

A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain any claim, action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until the foreign limited liability partnership registers with the secretary of state.

The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to register does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or prevent the foreign limited liability partnership from defending any claim, action, suit, or proceeding in any court in this state.

A foreign limited liability partnership, by transacting business in this state without registering, appoints the secretary of state as the foreign limited liability partnership’s agent upon whom any notice, process, or demand may be served.

A foreign limited liability partnership that transacts business in this state without registering is liable to the state for the years or parts of years during which the foreign limited liability partnership transacted business in this state without registering in an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by this chapter upon that foreign limited liability partnership had the foreign limited liability partnership duly registered, filed all reports required by this chapter, and paid all penalties imposed by this chapter. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover all amounts due this state under this section.

A foreign limited liability partnership that transacts business in this state without registering is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed five thousand dollars. Each managing partner or agent who authorizes, directs, or participates in the transaction of business in this state on behalf of a foreign limited liability partnership that has not registered is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed one thousand dollars.

The civil penalties set forth in subsection 5 may be recovered in an action brought within the district court of Burleigh County by the attorney general. Upon a finding by the court that a foreign limited liability partnership or any of the foreign limited liability partnership’s managing partners or agents have transacted business in this state in violation of this chapter, the court shall issue, in addition to the imposition of a civil penalty, an injunction restraining the further transaction of the business of the foreign limited liability partnership and further exercise of any rights and privileges by the foreign limited liability partnership in this state. The foreign limited liability partnership must be enjoined from transacting business in this state until all civil penalties plus any interest and court costs that the court may assess have been paid and until the foreign limited liability partnership has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 95, § 194.

45-22-21.
Foreign limited liability partnership — Transactions by a foreign limited liability partnership not constituting the transaction of business.

The following activities of a foreign limited liability partnership, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of this chapter:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding.

Holding meetings of partners or carrying on any other activities concerning internal affairs.

Maintaining bank accounts.

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign limited liability partnership’s own partnership interests or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those partnership interests.

Selling through independent contractors.

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before the orders become contracts.

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, with or without a mortgage, or other security interests in real or personal property.

Collecting debts, including foreclosing mortgages and canceling contracts for deed; enforcing other security interests on property; securing debts; accepting deeds or other instruments of title from debtors in lieu of foreclosure; canceling or other enforcement; and holding, protecting, and maintaining property acquired under this subdivision.

Selling or transferring title to property in this state to any person.

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like manner.

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

As used in this section, the term “transacting business” has no effect on personal jurisdiction under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

For purposes of this section, any foreign limited liability partnership that owns income-producing real or tangible personal property in this state, other than property exempted under subsection 1, is considered transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contracts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability partnership to service of process or taxation in this state or to regulation under any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1999, ch. 95, § 195.

45-22-21.1.
Secretary of state — Annual report of domestic limited liability partnership and foreign limited liability partnership.

Each domestic limited liability partnership and each foreign limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this state shall file, within the time provided by subsection 3, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the limited liability partnership and its jurisdiction of origin.

The address of the registered office of the limited liability partnership in this state, and the name of the limited liability partnership’s registered agent in this state at that address.

The address of the limited liability partnership’s chief executive office.

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited liability partnership is actually engaged in this state.

The name and respective address of each managing partner of the domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

If the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership owns or leases land that is used for farming or ranching in this state, a statement listing:

The names and addresses of all partners; and

The acreage [hectarage] and location listed by section, township, range, and county of all land in this state owned or leased by the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 24 of section 45-22-01, the partnership agreement, or in a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of partners. If the limited liability partnership is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the annual report must be signed on behalf of the limited liability partnership by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy any annual report provided for in this section after the annual report is on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report of a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership must be delivered to the secretary of state before April first of each year. The first annual report of a limited liability partnership must be delivered before April first of the year following the calendar year of the effective date stated in the registration and the first annual report of a foreign limited liability partnership must be delivered before April first of the year following the calendar year in which the registration is filed by the secretary of state. A limited liability partnership in existence on July 1, 1999, shall file the first annual report before April first in the year of the expiration of the registration in effect on July 1, 1999. The secretary of state must file the annual report if the annual report conforms to the requirements of subsection 2.

If the annual report does not conform, the annual report must be returned to the limited liability partnership for any necessary corrections.

If the annual report is filed before the deadlines provided in this subsection, penalties for the failure to file a report within the time provided do not apply if the annual report is corrected to conform to the requirements of subsection 2 and returned to the secretary of state within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for correction.

After the date established under subsection 3, the secretary of state shall notify any limited liability partnership failing to file an annual report that the limited liability partnership’s registration is not in good standing and that the registration of the limited liability partnership may be revoked pursuant to subsection 5.

The secretary of state shall mail notice of revocation to the last registered agent at the last registered office.

If the limited liability partnership files an annual report after the notice is mailed, together with the annual report filing fee and late filing penalty fee as provided by section 45-22-22, the secretary of state shall restore the limited liability partnership’s registration to good standing.

A domestic limited liability partnership that does not file an annual report, along with the statutory filing and penalty fees, within six months after the date established in subsection 3, forfeits the limited liability partnership’s registration.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the domestic limited liability partnership’s registration on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the revoked domestic limited liability partnership.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the domestic limited liability partnership’s last registered agent at the last registered office.

A foreign limited liability partnership that does not file an annual report, along with the statutory filing and penalty fees, within six months after the date established by subsection 3, forfeits the foreign limited liability partnership’s registration and authority to transact business in this state.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the foreign limited liability partnership’s registration and authority on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign limited liability partnership.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the foreign limited liability partnership’s last registered agent at the last registered office.

The secretary of state’s decision that a registration must be revoked under this subsection is final.

A domestic limited liability partnership with a registration that is revoked for failure to file an annual report or a foreign limited liability partnership with registration and authority that are forfeited by failure to file an annual report may be reinstated by filing a past-due report, together with the statutory filing and penalty fees for an annual report and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 45-22-22. The fees must be paid and the report filed within one year following the revocation. Reinstatement under this subsection does not affect any right or liability of a domestic limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership for the time from the revocation to the reinstatement.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 95, § 196; 2003, ch. 85, § 160; 2005, ch. 100, § 142; 2005, ch. 385, § 2; 2007, ch. 99, § 80; 2019, ch. 92, § 18, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 85, § 22, effective August 1, 2021.

45-22-22.
Secretary of state — Fees and charges.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing a registration as a domestic limited liability partnership, thirty-five dollars. If there are more than two managing partners, an additional three dollars must be paid for each additional managing partner not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

Filing a registration as a foreign limited liability partnership, sixty dollars.

Filing an annual report of a domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, twenty-five dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of an annual report as follows:

After the date provided in subsection 3 of section 45-22-21.1, twenty dollars; and

After the revocation of the domestic limited liability partnership registration or the foreign limited liability partnership registration, the reinstatement fee of fifty dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this subdivision are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 45-22-21.1 or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subdivision.

Filing a statement of correction or amended registration, twenty-five dollars.

Filing an application to reserve a name, ten dollars.

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved name, ten dollars.

Filing a cancellation of a reserved name, ten dollars.

Filing a consent to use of name, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent or both, or change of address of registered office by registered agent, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing a notice of withdrawal, ten dollars.

Filing a certificate of fact stating a merger of a foreign limited liability partnership registered with the secretary of state, fifty dollars.

Filing any other statement of a domestic limited liability partnership, ten dollars.

Filing any process, notice, or demand for service, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Any record submitted for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this section for filing the record.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Furnishing a copy of any record or paper relating to a domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, the fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record.

A certificate certifying a copy or reciting facts related to a domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, fifteen dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 238; 1999, ch. 95, § 197; 2005, ch. 100, § 143; 2007, ch. 101, § 76; 2007, ch. 99, § 81; 2009, ch. 106, § 73.

45-22-23.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement — Penalty — Appeal.

The secretary of state shall administer this chapter.

The secretary of state may propound to any limited liability partnership subject to this chapter and to any partner any interrogatory reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the partnership has complied with this chapter.

Any interrogatory must be answered within thirty days after mailing or within any additional time fixed by the secretary of state. Every answer to the interrogatory must be full and complete and be made in writing and under oath.

If an interrogatory is directed:

To an individual, the interrogatory must be answered by that individual;

To a domestic limited liability partnership, the interrogatory must be answered by a managing partner; or

To a foreign limited liability partnership, the interrogatory must be answered by a resident partner or, if no partner is a resident partner, a partner designated by the foreign limited liability partnership.

The secretary of state need not file any record to which an interrogatory relates until the interrogatory is answered, except if the answers disclose the record is not in conformity with this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for any action the attorney general determines appropriate, any interrogatory and answers that disclose a violation of this chapter.

Each managing partner of a domestic limited liability partnership or a resident partner or designated partner of a foreign limited liability partnership who fails or refuses within the time provided by this section to answer truthfully and fully every interrogatory propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

Any interrogatory propounded by the secretary of state and the answers are not open to public inspection under section 44-04-18. The secretary of state may not disclose any fact or information obtained from an interrogatory except to the extent permitted by law or required for evidence in any criminal proceeding or other action by this state.

If the secretary of state rejects any record required by this chapter to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed, the secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the limited liability partnership may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of that court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state. The court shall try the matter de novo.

The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take any action the court determines proper.

If the secretary of state revokes the registration of any foreign limited liability partnership pursuant to section 45-22-16, then the foreign limited liability partnership may appeal to district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of that court a petition, including:

A copy of the foreign limited liability partnership’s registration; and

A copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state. The court shall try the matter de novo. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take any action the court determines proper.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a domestic limited liability partnership registration that has been revoked as provided in subsection 5 of section 45-22-22.1, or for reinstatement of the registration of a foreign limited liability partnership that has been revoked as provided in subsection 6 of section 45-22-21.1, then, together with any other action the court deems proper, any such order which orders the reinstatement of the registration of a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership registration shall require the domestic or foreign limited liability partnership to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subsection 1 of section 45-22-22; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 1 of section 45-22-22.

The attorney general may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 239; 1999, ch. 95, § 198; 2005, ch. 100, § 144; 2009, ch. 106, § 74.

45-22-23.1.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state and effective date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines that a record complies with the filing requirements of this chapter, then the secretary of state shall file the record and return a copy of the filed record to the person that delivered it to the secretary of state for filing. That person shall then:

For a statement of dissociation, send a copy of the filed statement:

To the person which the statement indicates has dissociated as a partner; and

To the limited liability partnership; and

For all other records, send a copy of the filed record to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of a fee provided in section 45-22-22, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of the requested record.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date within ninety days. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the secretary of state is effective:

If the record does not specify a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

If the record specifies a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the specified date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 145.

45-22-23.2.
Correcting a filed record.

With respect to correction of a filed record:

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the limited liability partnership that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed:

On the date the statement of correction was filed:

As to persons adversely affected by the correction; and

For the purposes of subsections 3 and 4 of section 45-10.2-06; and

On the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 145.

45-22-24.
Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All copies of documents filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to domestic limited liability partnerships or foreign limited liability partnerships which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing documents or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 240; 1999, ch. 95, § 199; 2011, ch. 87, § 72.

45-22-25.
Forms to be furnished by the secretary of state.

Every annual report must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Upon request, the secretary of state may furnish forms for all other documents to be filed in the office of the secretary of state. However, the use of these documents, unless otherwise specifically required by law, is not mandatory.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 241; 1999, ch. 95, § 200.

45-22-26.
Audit reports and audit of limited liability partnerships receiving state subsidies for production of alcohol or methanol for combination with gasoline.

Any limited liability partnership that produces agricultural ethyl alcohol or methanol within this state and which receives a production subsidy from the state, whether in the form of reduced taxes or otherwise, shall submit an annual audit report, prepared by a certified public accountant based on an audit of all records and accounts of the limited liability partnership, to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. The audit must be submitted within ninety days of the close of the taxable year of the limited liability partnership. Upon request of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee, the state auditor shall conduct an audit of the records and accounts of any limited liability partnership required to submit an annual report under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 242; 1999, ch. 95, § 201.

45-22-27.
Foreign trade zones.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act of Congress” means the Act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled an act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign trade zones and ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce and for other purposes, as amended, and commonly known as the Foreign Trade Zone Act of 1934 [48 Stat. 998; 19 U.S.C. 81a et seq.], as amended.

“Private limited liability partnership” means a domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, one of the purposes of which is to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign trade zone by itself or in conjunction with a public corporation.

“Public corporation” means this state, any political subdivision of this state, any public agency of this state or any political subdivision of this state, or any corporate instrumentality of this state.

Any private limited liability partnership or public corporation may apply to the proper authorities of the United States for a grant of the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones and to do all things necessary and proper to carry into effect the establishment, operation, and maintenance of such zones, in accordance with the Act of Congress and other applicable laws and rules.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 243; 1999, ch. 95, § 202.